test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-v_v43_odd_liueta_gt-norm-dial_Por.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 
  Verb - liueta - ei tsekattu : # Verb 'to dissolve' - ei tsekattu
  
     liueta+V+Inf: liueta
     liueta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: liukkeen
     liueta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: liukkeet
     liueta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: liukkee
     liueta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: liukkeema
     liueta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: liukkeetta
     liueta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: liuethaan
     liueta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: liukesin
     liueta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: liukesit
     liueta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: liukes
     liueta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: liukesimma
     liueta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: liukesitta
     liueta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: liuethiin
     liueta+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: liuenu
     liueta+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Nom: liuettu
     liueta+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: liuenheet
     liueta+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: liukkeeva
     liueta+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: liukkeevat
     liueta+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: liuettava
     liueta+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: liuettavat
     
     liueta+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: liukkeisin
     liueta+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: liukkeisit
     liueta+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: liukkeis
     liueta+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: liukkeisimma
     liueta+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: liukkeisitta
     liueta+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: liuettais
     liueta+V+Pass+Cond: liuettais
    
     liueta+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: liukkee
     liueta+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: liuekkaa
     
     liueta+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: liukkeemassa
     liueta+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: liukkeemasta
     liueta+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: liukkeemhaan
     liueta+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: liukkeemalla
     liueta+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: liukkeematta
